src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/Num-njolj_gt-norm.yaml
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Car: нёльӧдъястӧг
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Cns: нёльӧдъясла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Ine: нёльӧдъясын
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Ela: нёльӧдъясысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Ill: нёльӧдъясӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Apr: нёльӧдъяслань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Egr: нёльӧдъяссянь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Prl: нёльӧдъясӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Prl+Tra: нёльӧдъясӧдті
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Ter: нёльӧдъясӧдз
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясыдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясыдлысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясыдлы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: нёльӧдъястӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: нёльӧдъяснад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Com+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясыдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Car+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясыдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Cns+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясыдла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: нёльӧдъяссьыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясыдлань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясыдсянь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Ter+PxSg2: нёльӧдъясӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясыслӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясыслысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясыслы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: нёльӧдъяссӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: нёльӧдъяснас
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Com+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясыскӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Car+PxSg3: нёльӧдъястӧгыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Cns+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясысла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясас
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: нёльӧдъяссьыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясас
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясыслань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясыссянь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Pl+Ter+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясӧдзыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Nom: нёльнан
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Acc: [нёльнан, нёльнансӧ]
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Gen: нёльнанлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Abl: нёльнанлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Dat: нёльнанлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ins: нёльнанӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Com: нёльнанкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Car: нёльнантӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Cns: нёльнанла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ine: нёльнанын
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ela: нёльнанысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ill: нёльнанӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Apr: нёльнанлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Egr: нёльнансянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Prl: нёльнанӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Prl+Tra: нёльнанӧдті
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ter: нёльнанӧдз
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: нёльнанӧй
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: нёльнанӧйлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: нёльнанӧйлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: нёльнанӧйлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: нёльнанӧс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: нёльнаннам
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Com+PxSg1: нёльнанӧйкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Car+PxSg1: нёльнанӧйтӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Cns+PxSg1: нёльнанӧйла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: нёльнанам
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: нёльнансьым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: нёльнанам
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Apr+PxSg1: нёльнанӧйлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Egr+PxSg1: нёльнанӧйсянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: нёльнанӧдым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ter+PxSg1: нёльнанӧдзым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: нёльнаныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: нёльнаныдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: нёльнаныдлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: нёльнаныдлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: нёльнантӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: нёльнаннад
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Com+PxSg2: нёльнаныдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Car+PxSg2: нёльнаныдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Cns+PxSg2: нёльнаныдла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: нёльнанад
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: нёльнансьыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: нёльнанад
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: нёльнаныдлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: нёльнаныдсянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: нёльнанӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ter+PxSg2: нёльнанӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: нёльнаныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: нёльнаныслӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: нёльнаныслысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: нёльнаныслы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: нёльнансӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: нёльнаннас
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Com+PxSg3: нёльнаныскӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Car+PxSg3: нёльнаныстӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: нёльнанысла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: нёльнанас
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: нёльнансьыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: нёльнанас
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: нёльнаныслань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: нёльнаныссянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: нёльнанӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ter+PxSg3: нёльнанӧдзыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: нёльнанным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: нёльнаннымлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: нёльнаннымлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: нёльнаннымлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: нёльнаннымӧс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: нёльнаннаным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Com+PxPl1: нёльнаннымкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Car+PxPl1: нёльнаннымтӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Cns+PxPl1: нёльнаннымла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: нёльнананым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: нёльнансьыным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: нёльнананым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: нёльнаннымлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: нёльнаннымсянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: нёльнанӧдным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ter+PxPl1: нёльнанӧдзным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: нёльнанныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: нёльнанныдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: нёльнанныдлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: нёльнанныдлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: нёльнаннытӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: нёльнаннаныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Com+PxPl2: нёльнанныдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Car+PxPl2: нёльнанныдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Cns+PxPl2: нёльнанныдла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: нёльнананыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: нёльнансьыныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: нёльнананыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Apr+PxPl2: нёльнанныдлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: нёльнанныдсянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: нёльнанӧдныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ter+PxPl2: нёльнанӧдзныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: нёльнанныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: нёльнанныслӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: нёльнанныслысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: нёльнанныслы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: нёльнаннысӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: нёльнаннаныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Com+PxPl3: нёльнанныскӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Car+PxPl3: нёльнанныстӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Cns+PxPl3: нёльнаннысла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: нёльнананыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: нёльнансьыныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: нёльнананыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: нёльнанныслань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: нёльнанныссянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: нёльнанӧдныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Sg+Ter+PxPl3: нёльнанӧдзныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Nom: нёльнанъяс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Acc: [нёльнанъяс, нёльнанъяссӧ]
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Gen: нёльнанъяслӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Abl: нёльнанъяслысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Dat: нёльнанъяслы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ins: нёльнанъясӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Com: нёльнанъяскӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Car: нёльнанъястӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Cns: нёльнанъясла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ine: нёльнанъясын
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ela: нёльнанъясысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ill: нёльнанъясӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Apr: нёльнанъяслань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Egr: нёльнанъяссянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Prl: нёльнанъясӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Prl+Tra: нёльнанъясӧдті
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ter: нёльнанъясӧдз
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: нёльнанъясӧй
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: нёльнанъясӧйлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: нёльнанъясӧйлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: нёльнанъясӧйлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: нёльнанъясӧс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: нёльнанъяснам
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Com+PxSg1: нёльнанъясӧйкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Car+PxSg1: нёльнанъясӧйтӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Cns+PxSg1: нёльнанъясӧйла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: нёльнанъясам
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: нёльнанъяссьым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: нёльнанъясам
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Apr+PxSg1: нёльнанъясӧйлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Egr+PxSg1: нёльнанъясӧйсянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: нёльнанъясӧдым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ter+PxSg1: нёльнанъясӧдзым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: нёльнанъясыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: нёльнанъясыдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: нёльнанъясыдлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: нёльнанъясыдлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: нёльнанъястӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: нёльнанъяснад
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Com+PxSg2: нёльнанъясыдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Car+PxSg2: нёльнанъясыдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Cns+PxSg2: нёльнанъясыдла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: нёльнанъясад
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: нёльнанъяссьыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: нёльнанъясад
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: нёльнанъясыдлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: нёльнанъясыдсянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: нёльнанъясӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ter+PxSg2: нёльнанъясӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: нёльнанъясыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: нёльнанъясыслӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: нёльнанъясыслысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: нёльнанъясыслы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: нёльнанъяссӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: нёльнанъяснас
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Com+PxSg3: нёльнанъясыскӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Car+PxSg3: нёльнанъясыстӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Cns+PxSg3: нёльнанъясысла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: нёльнанъясас
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: нёльнанъяссьыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: нёльнанъясас
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: нёльнанъясыслань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: нёльнанъясыссянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: нёльнанъясӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ter+PxSg3: нёльнанъясӧдзыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: нёльнанъясным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: нёльнанъяснымлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: нёльнанъяснымлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: нёльнанъяснымлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: нёльнанъяснымӧс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: нёльнанъяснаным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Com+PxPl1: нёльнанъяснымкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Car+PxPl1: нёльнанъяснымтӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Cns+PxPl1: нёльнанъяснымла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: нёльнанъясаным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: нёльнанъяссьыным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: нёльнанъясаным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: нёльнанъяснымлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: нёльнанъяснымсянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: нёльнанъясӧдным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ter+PxPl1: нёльнанъясӧдзным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: нёльнанъясныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: нёльнанъясныдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: нёльнанъясныдлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: нёльнанъясныдлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: нёльнанъяснытӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: нёльнанъяснаныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Com+PxPl2: нёльнанъясныдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Car+PxPl2: нёльнанъясныдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Cns+PxPl2: нёльнанъясныдла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: нёльнанъясаныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: нёльнанъяссьыныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: нёльнанъясаныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: нёльнанъясныдлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: нёльнанъясныдсянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: нёльнанъясӧдныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: нёльнанъясӧдзныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: нёльнанъясныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: нёльнанъясныслӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: нёльнанъясныслысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: нёльнанъясныслы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: нёльнанъяснысӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: нёльнанъяснаныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Com+PxPl3: нёльнанъясныскӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Car+PxPl3: нёльнанъясныстӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Cns+PxPl3: нёльнанъяснысла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: нёльнанъясаныс
